Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3204
Retention of captured plate data; limitation; updates; use; limitations.

(1) A governmental entity shall not retain captured plate data obtained under subsection (2) of section 60-3203 for more than one hundred eighty days unless the captured plate data is:

(a) Evidence related to a purpose listed in subsection (2) of section 60-3203;

(b) Subject to a preservation request under subsection (1) of section 60-3205; or

(c) The subject of a warrant, subpoena, or court order.

(2) Any governmental entity that uses automatic license plate reader systems pursuant to subsection (2) of section 60-3203 must update such systems from the databases used by the governmental entities enumerated in such subsection at the beginning of each law enforcement agency shift if such updates are available.

(3) Any governmental entity that uses automatic license plate reader systems pursuant to subsection (2) of section 60-3203 may manually query captured plate data only when a law enforcement officer determines that the vehicle or individuals associated with the license plate number are relevant and material to an ongoing criminal or missing persons investigation subject to the following limitations:

(a) Any manual entry must document the reason for the entry; and

(b) Manual entries must be automatically purged at the end of each law enforcement agency shift, unless the criminal investigation or missing persons investigation remains ongoing.

Laws 2018, LB93, § 4.